California statutes. Insurance Code
The forms of the policies, applications, certificates or other evidence of insurance coverage, commission schedules and applicable premium rates relating thereto shall be filed with the commissioner. No such policy, contract, certificate or other evidence of insurance, application or other form shall be sold, issued or used and no endorsement shall be attached to or printed or stamped thereon unless the form thereof shall have been approved by the commissioner or 30 days shall have expired after such filing without written notice from the commissioner of disapproval thereof. The commissioner shall disapprove the forms for such insurance if he finds that they are unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading or deceptive or that the rates are by reasonable assumptions excessive in relation to the benefits provided. In determining whether such rates by reasonable assumptions are excessive in relation to the benefits provided, the commissioner shall give due consideration to past and prospective claim experience, within and outside this State, and to fluctuations in such claim experience, to a reasonable risk charge, to contribution to surplus and contingency funds, to past and prospective expenses, both within and outside this State, and to all other relevant factors within and outside this State including any differing operating methods of the insurers joining in the issue of the policy. In exercising the powers conferred upon him by this section, the commissioner shall not be bound by any other requirement of this code with respect to standard provisions to be included in disability policies or forms.

The commissioner may, after hearing upon written notice, withdraw an approval previously given, upon such grounds as in his opinion would authorize disapproval upon original submission thereof. Any such withdrawal of approval after hearing shall be by notice in writing specifying the ground thereof and shall be effective at the expiration of such period, not less than 90 days after the giving of notice of withdrawal, as the commissioner shall in such notice prescribe.

If and when a program of hospital, surgical and medical benefits is enacted by the federal government or the State of California, the extended health insurance benefits provided by policies issued under this article shall be adjusted to avoid any duplication of benefits offered by the federal or state programs and the premium rates applicable thereto shall be adjusted to conform with the adjusted benefits.

The association shall submit an annual report to the Insurance Commissioner which shall become public information and shall provide information as to the number of persons insured, the names of the insurers participating in the association with respect to insurance offered under this article and the calendar year experience applicable to such insurance offered under this article, including premiums earned, claims paid during the calendar year, the amount of claims reserve established, administrative expenses, commissions, promotional expenses, taxes, contingency reserve, other expenses, and profit and loss for the year. The commissioner shall require the association to provide any and all information concerning the operations of the association deemed relevant by him for inclusion in the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.6.

The articles of association of any association formed in accordance with this article, all amendments and supplements thereto, a designation in writing of a resident of this State as agent for the service of process, and a list of insurers who are members of the association and all supplements thereto shall be filed with the commissioner.

The name of any association or any advertising or promotional material used in connection with extended health insurance to be sold, offered, or issued, pursuant to this article shall not be such as to mislead or deceive the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------

795.7.

No act done, action taken or agreement made pursuant to the authority conferred by this article shall constitute a violation of or grounds for prosecution or civil proceedings under any other law of this State heretofore or hereafter enacted which does not specifically refer to insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2055.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.8. Claims Reviewers [796.01. - 796.04.]

796.01.

Disability insurers and nonprofit hospital service plans shall, upon rejecting a claim from a health care provider or a patient, and upon their demand, disclose the specific rationale used in determining why the claim was rejected. Nothing in this section is intended to expand or restrict the ability of a health care provider or a patient from having health care coverage approved in advance of services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

796.02.

Compensation of a person retained by a disability insurer to review claims for health care services shall not be based on either of the following:

(a) A percentage of the amount by which a claim is reduced for payment.

(b) The number of claims or the cost of services for which the person has denied authorization or payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 787, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

796.03.

This article does not apply to services or benefits provided pursuant to Medi-Cal, including services or benefits provided under Chapters 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 544, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

796.04.

A health insurer that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that authorizes a specific type of treatment for services covered under a policyholder’s contract or plan by a provider shall not rescind or modify this authorization after the provider renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to the authorization for any reason, including, but not limited to, the insurer’s subsequent rescission, cancellation, or modification of the insured’s or policyholder’s contract or the insurer’s subsequent determination that it did not make an accurate determination of the insured’s eligibility. This section shall not be construed to expand or alter the benefits available or the terms and conditions of the contract as may be agreed upon between a policyholder, certificate holder, or trust, and the insurer. The Legislature finds and declares that by adopting the amendments made to this section by Assembly Bill 1324 of the 2007–08 Regular Session it does not intend to instruct a court as to whether or not the amendments are existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.9. The Equal Insurance HIV Act [799. - 799.11.]

799.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Article 6.9 (commencing with Section 799) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code was originally enacted in 1988 and was last amended in 1997. These laws require an update to reflect advancements in testing and medical treatments for individuals living with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).

(2) When the HIV/AIDS epidemic began in the United States, HIV was considered a life-threatening condition because relatively little was known at the time about HIV detection, transmission, or treatment. Today, however, just as with other chronic health conditions, HIV can be effectively managed.

(3) According to data collected by the Antiretroviral Therapy Cohort Collaboration from 1996 to 2013, inclusive, modern antiretroviral therapy (ART) is more sophisticated than original treatments, causes fewer adverse effects, and results in a life expectancy similar to people not living with HIV.

(4) The National Institutes of Health notes that ART can suppress an individual’s viral load to a point where HIV is undetectable in the blood, and the chance of HIV developing into AIDS is reduced.

(5) Research shows that in recent years, people living with HIV who are receiving treatment have a life expectancy of approximately 70 to 78 years or more, depending on other determinants of health and how early treatment was commenced, compared to a life expectancy of 39 years in 1996. The risk of death due to AIDS-related causes
 has declined dramatically.

(6) It is now possible for HIV-positive individuals to have an average life expectancy. They should have the same opportunities as other individuals with chronic medical conditions to purchase life insurance and disability income insurance.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to ensure the equitable health and well-being of all people living in California.

(c) The purposes of this article are to do all of the following:

(1) Establish standards that prevent life or disability income insurers from making or permitting unfair distinctions between individuals of the same class in underwriting life insurance or disability income insurance for individuals living with HIV.

(2) Require the maintenance of strict confidentiality for personal information obtained through testing.

(3) Require informed consent before a life or disability income insurer tests for HIV.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.01.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “AIDS” means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.

(b) “Certificate” means a certificate of group life insurance or a certificate of group disability income insurance delivered in this state, regardless of the situs of the group master policy. A certificate of life insurance benefits or disability income insurance benefits issued or delivered in this state by a fraternal benefit society is a “policy” as defined in subdivision (h).

(c) “Disability income insurance” means insurance against loss of occupational earning capacity arising from injury, sickness, or
 disablement.

(d) “HIV” or “human immunodeficiency virus” means the etiologic virus of AIDS.

(e) “HIV test” means any clinical test, laboratory or otherwise, used to identify HIV, a component of HIV, or antibodies or antigens to HIV.

(f) “Life or disability income insurer” means an insurer licensed to transact life insurance or disability insurance in this state that is transacting life insurance or disability income insurance in this state, or a fraternal benefit society licensed in this state that is transacting life insurance or disability income insurance in this state.

(g) “Life insurance” means the class of coverage described in Section 101, but, as used in this article, excludes annuities.

(h) “Policy” means an individual life insurance policy or individual disability income insurance policy issued or delivered in this state, or a certificate of life insurance benefits or disability income insurance benefits issued or delivered in this state by a fraternal benefit society.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.02.

(a) A life or disability income insurer shall not decline an application or an enrollment request for coverage under a policy or certificate for life insurance or disability income insurance based solely on the results of a positive HIV test, regardless of when or at whose direction the test was performed.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, this article does not prevent or otherwise restrict a life or disability income insurer from refusing to insure an applicant that is HIV positive, limiting the amount, extent, or kind of coverage for an applicant that is HIV positive, or charging a different rate to an applicant that is HIV positive, if the refusal,
 limitation, or charge is based on sound actuarial principles and actual or reasonably anticipated experience.

(c) Transferring an applicant from a simplified, expedited, accelerated, or algorithmic underwriting process to a traditional medical underwriting process, based solely on the results of a positive HIV test, does not constitute a denial of the application or a violation of this section.

(d) This section applies if coverage is contingent upon medical review for other diseases or medical conditions.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 11.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

799.03.

(a) A life or disability income insurer shall not require a test for HIV or for the presence of antibodies to HIV for the purpose of determining insurability other than pursuant to the informed consent, counseling, and privacy protection provisions of this article and Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791). Notwithstanding any other law, this constitutes the exclusive requirements for counseling, informed consent, and privacy protection for that testing.

(b) A life or disability income insurer that asks an applicant to undergo an HIV test shall obtain the applicant’s written informed consent for the test. Written informed consent shall include a description of the test to be performed, including its purpose, potential uses, and limitations, the meaning of its
 results, procedures for notifying the applicant of the results, and the right to confidential treatment of the results. Before the applicant signs the consent, the insurer shall provide the applicant with both of the following, on paper or electronically, whichever the applicant chooses:

(1) Material describing HIV, its causes and symptoms, the manner in which it is spread, the test or tests used to detect HIV or the HIV antibody, and what a person can do whose test results are positive or negative.

(2) A list of counseling resources available, where the applicant can obtain assistance in understanding the meaning of the test and its results. The list shall be provided from publicly available information or internet websites, and shall include resources available from the State Department of Public Health and the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(c) The life or disability income insurer that asks an applicant to undergo an HIV test shall notify an applicant of a positive test result by notifying the applicant’s designated physician. If the applicant tested has not given written consent authorizing a physician to receive the test results, the applicant shall be urged, at the time the applicant is informed of the positive test results, to contact a private physician, the county department of health, the State Department of Public Health, local medical societies, or alternative test sites for appropriate counseling.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 134, Sec. 1.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

799.04.

A life or disability income insurer shall not require an applicant to undergo an HIV test unless the cost of the test is borne by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.05.

A life or disability income insurer shall not consider the marital status, actual or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, living arrangements, occupation, beneficiary designation, or ZIP Codes or other territorial classification within this state, or any combination thereof, of an applicant for life insurance or disability income insurance in determining whether to require an HIV test of that applicant.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 134, Sec. 2.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

799.06.

All underwriting activities undertaken by life or disability income insurers pursuant to this article shall be subject to all applicable provisions of Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791). An application or enrollment request for life insurance or disability income insurance shall not contain a question pertaining to prior HIV tests unless the question is limited in scope to prior testing for the purpose of obtaining insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.07.

If an applicant has had a positive HIV test, a life or disability income insurer shall not report a code to an insurance support organization as defined in Section 791.02 or another insurer unless a nonspecific test result code is used that does not indicate that the individual was subject to an HIV test.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.09.

A life or disability income insurer shall not require an applicant to take an HIV test if the results of the test would be used exclusively or nonexclusively for the purpose of determining eligibility for hospital, medical, or surgical insurance coverage or eligibility for coverage under a nonprofit hospital service plan or health care service plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

799.10.

(a) This section applies to the disclosure of the results of HIV tests requested by a life or disability income insurer pursuant to this article and, notwithstanding Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code does not apply to the disclosure of the results of HIV tests conducted pursuant to this article.

(b) A person who negligently discloses results of an HIV test to a third party, in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Section 1603.1, 1603.3, or 121022 of the Health and Safety Code, or in any other law that expressly
 provides an exemption to this section, shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(c) A person who willfully or maliciously discloses the results of an HIV test to a third party, in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Section 1603.1, 1603.3, or 121022 of the Health and Safety Code, or in any other law that expressly provides an exemption to this section, shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the
 subject of the test.

(d) A person who willfully, maliciously, or negligently discloses the results of an HIV test to a third party, in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization, as described in subdivision (g), or except as provided in this article or in Section 1603.1, 1603.3, or 121022 of the Health and Safety Code, or in any other law that expressly provides an exemption to this section, that results in economic, bodily, or psychological harm to the subject of the test, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed 364 calendar days, or by a fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) A person who commits any act described in subdivision (b) or (c) shall be
 liable to the subject for all actual damages, including damages for economic, bodily, or psychological harm that is proximately caused by the act.

(f) Each disclosure made in violation of this section is a separate and actionable offense.

(g) “Written authorization,” as used in this section, applies only to the disclosure of test results by a person responsible for the care and treatment of the person subject to the test. Written authorization is required for each separate disclosure of the test results, and shall include to whom the disclosure would be made.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 134, Sec. 4.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

799.11.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Restrictions on Underwriting [800. - 805.]

800.

This article shall not apply to:

(a) Insurers made exempt therefrom by other provisions of this code.

(b) Insurance upon the interests of common carriers engaged in interstate trade, or upon property in their custody.

(c) Insurance contracts executed without this state, but which during the term thereof temporarily cover subject matter within this state.

(d) Bid bonds issued by any admitted insurer in connection with any public or private contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 590.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

The amendments made in any sections contained in this article by the Statutes of the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not repeal, rescind or affect the interpretation of Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 685) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of, or Section 1750.5 of this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

Any admitted insurer may, by means of temporary binders, execute contracts of insurance at offices outside this state upon subject matter located in this state if policies therefor are thereafter issued by it.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 805 by Stats. 1969, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

(a) No admitted insurer shall assume or reinsure the liabilities of a nonadmitted insurer upon subject matter located in this state for the purpose of circumventing the rate and form provisions of this code, or the nonadmitted insurer provisions in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760) of Part 2, and their implementing regulations. Notwithstanding Section 804, if, after notice and hearing, the commissioner determines that a reinsurance agreement was entered into in violation of this section, then the insurer shall be subject to a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), for each such reinsurance agreement, and the commissioner may enter any other corrective order he or she deems necessary.

(b) The commissioner shall issue a bulletin to govern the reporting to the department by admitted insurers of their reinsurance transactions with nonadmitted insurers. The bulletin shall specify the types of reinsurance subject to reporting, the amounts which shall be reported, and the manner in which that information shall be reported. The bulletin shall require reporting of sufficient information to enable the department to evaluate compliance with subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 580, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

Any insurer willfully violating any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereof, or the commissioner may suspend the certificate of authority of such insurer for the remainder of the term thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 180.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

The license of any licensee that is suspended by the Secretary of State shall become inactive. The inactive licensee shall not conduct any activity for which a license, issued by the commissioner, is required until the licensee is no longer suspended by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.3. Servicing of Insurance Contracts [810. - 810.]

810.

An admitted insurer, without first obtaining the written consent of the commissioner, shall not enter into any agreement or arrangement with any nonadmitted insurer by way of sale, reinsurance, merger, consolidation, assumption, or in any other manner which results in the admitted insurer ceasing to service in this state any group insurance contract or 10 or more individual insurance contracts entered into in this state or issued for delivery in this state insuring the life or person of any resident of this state or any property in this state.

Service as used in this section includes but is not limited to:

(a) Adjustment and payment of losses.

(b) Appropriate amendment of insurance contracts as called for therein to keep the coverage consistent with current conditions.

(c) Collection of premiums.

(d) Issuance of policies, certificates and other documents, in fulfillment of prior agreements.

(e) Returning unearned premiums.

(f) Payment of cash values.

No admitted insurer shall in whole or in part or in any manner so cease to so service such insurance business without such written consent from the commissioner unless it has by valid contract arranged for an admitted insurer to perform such servicing.

This section shall not affect or modify any of the provisions of this code relating to statement credit allowed for reinsurance.

Violation of this section constitutes a failure to comply with the laws of this state regarding the governmental control of insurers within the meaning of Section 701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Restrictions on Compensation of Adjusters [815. - 816.]

815.

No insurer shall pay any representative given discretion as to the settlement or adjustment of claims under life or disability policies, whether in direct negotiation with the claimant or in supervision of the person negotiating, a compensation which in any way is contingent upon the amount of settlement of such claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1445.)
-------------------------------------------

816.

No insurer shall pay any person given discretion as to settlement of claims under any policy of insurance, or surety bond, whether in direct negotiation with the claimant or in supervision of the person negotiating, a compensation which in any way is contingent upon the amount of settlement of such claims, except as in this section otherwise expressly provided.

This section shall apply equally to a single claim, a number of specified claims, an aggregate of claims during a specified period of time or an aggregate of claims under any contract, agreement or arrangement.

This section shall not affect the interpretation or provisions of Section 815. 

The word “person” as used in this section includes, but is not limited to: employees, agents, brokers, representatives, general agents, managing general agents, surplus line brokers, insureds, coinsureds, adjusters and independent contractors but does not include attorneys in fact or other exclusive managers of an insurer.

This section does not apply to:

(a) Compensation of a producer, managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent under any arrangement, agreement or contract whereby the producer or general agent is not granted discretion in the actual adjustment or settlement of any or all individual claims settled for an amount exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) A producer, managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent who is compensated by a contingent commission arrangement based wholly or partly on underwriting results, unless the arrangement guarantees an agreed return to the insurer which may exceed the underwriting profit actually earned by the insurer on business written through the producer, managing general agent, surplus line broker or general agent.

(c) Contracts of reinsurance between insurers.

(d) An arrangement, schedule of charges, agreement or contract, express or implied, for the adjustment of claims under which the compensation for the services of the person making the adjustment (exclusive of reimbursement for actual expenses) consistently increases, in reasonable brackets, as the amount paid in settlement of a claim increases.

An insurer which in any other jurisdiction is making payments which would be in violation of this section if made in respect to insurance business done in this state shall not be admitted to this state until it presents evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that it will not make such payments in this state and that it will within one year after admission to this state cease to make any such payments in any other jurisdiction and, within the same period, terminate any contract or arrangement under which such payments are to be paid. Failure to so cease such payments and to so terminate such contracts and arrangements within such period of one year shall constitute grounds for revocation of the insurer’s certificate of authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 200.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Issue of Securities [820. - 860.]

820.

The terms used in this article shall be given the meanings herein set forth, but such meanings shall not, merely by reason of enactment in this article, govern the interpretation of any other provision of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

“Security” means every instrument commonly known by that term, except:

(a) Commercial paper when issued, given or acquired in a bona fide way in the ordinary course of legitimate business, trade or commerce.

(b) Promissory notes, whether secured or unsecured, if not offered to the public, and if not sold to an underwriter of the sale for the purpose of resale.

(c) Mortgage participation certificates issued under and in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2, Part 6, Division 2.

(d) Policies of insurance issued by an insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

821.5.

Without in any manner affecting the scope of the term “security” as set forth in section 821, and with the exceptions therein set forth, the following instruments are particularly specified as securities within the meaning of that section: every stock, bond, note, treasury stock, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, certificate evidencing a contribution, certificate of interest or participation, certificate of interest in a profit sharing agreement, collateral trust certificate, any transferable share, investment contract, or beneficial interest in title to property, contracts or earnings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, “sale” or “sell” means every disposition, or attempt or arrangement to dispose, of a security or interest in a security for value, whether done by direct or indirect means. A security is conclusively presumed to be sold for value if given with any purchase of any nature or if given as a bonus on account of a purchase. “Sale” or “sell” shall also mean a contract of sale, an exchange, any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions on outstanding securities, an attempt to sell, an option of sale, a solicitation of a sale, a subscription or an offer to sell directly or by a stock agent, or a circular letter, advertisement or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

(a) A privilege pertaining to a security giving the holder the privilege to convert such security into another security of the same insurer is not a sale of such other security.

(b) A right pertaining to a security and entitling the holder of such right to subscribe to another security of the same insurer is not a sale of such other security, but the sale of such other security upon the exercise of such right shall be subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

824.

“Broker” means every person, other than a stock agent, who in this state engages either wholly or in part in the business of (a) dealing in any security issued by others, (b) underwriting any issue of such securities, (c) purchasing such securities with the purpose of reselling them, or (d) offering such securities for sale to the public. Authority to act as a broker shall not be implied from an appointment executed by an insurer appointing a stock agent of that insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

825.

“Stock agent” means every person employed or appointed by an insurer or broker who, within this state and for a compensation, sells any security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 3.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

“Insurer” for the purposes of this article includes every organization organized for the purpose of assuming the risk of loss under contracts of insurance or reinsurance, and also includes any of the following organizations:

(a) An admitted insurer,

(b) A nonadmitted domestic insurer,

(c) A nonadmitted foreign insurer,

(d) A nonadmitted alien insurer,

(e) An underwritten title company, or an organization organized for the purpose of doing an underwritten title business, whether licensed or not, and

(f) An attorney in fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, whether it be admitted or not, or an organization organized for the purpose of acting as the attorney in fact of a reciprocal, or interinsurance exchange, whether the same be admitted or not.

“Insurer” shall not include, unless specified in subdivisions (a) through (f), inclusive, an organization, which though required to obtain a certificate or license from the commissioner, is organized or to be organized primarily for purposes other than assuming the risk of loss under contracts or agreements of insurance.

The amendments of this section by the Legislature at the 1965 Regular Session, except as they relate to underwritten title companies, attorneys in fact, and exclusive managers, shall be construed as a restatement and continuation of the law existing prior to such amendment. Every permit issued by the commissioner or the Commissioner of Corporations to an insurer as defined in this section prior to its amendment by the Legislature at 1965 Regular Session shall be valid and effective for all purposes stated therein, from the date of its issuance until the date of expiration stated therein.

Every permit issued by the commissioner under the authority of former subdivision (g) of this section from the date such subdivision became effective in 1965 until the effective date of the amendment to this section at the 1970 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be valid and effective for all purposes stated therein, from the date of its issuance until the expiration date specified therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

An insurer shall not sell in this state, except upon a sale for delinquent assessment made in accordance with the provisions of Section 423 of the Corporations Code, or offer for sale, negotiate for the sale of, or take subscriptions for any security of its own issue until it shall have first applied for and secured from the commissioner a permit authorizing it so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

827.3.

(a) As used in this section, the term “insurer” means an insurer which is domestic and admitted.

(b) The transactions of an insurer set out in subdivisions (c) and (d) are exempt from Section 827 if they meet all of the following requirements:

(1) They are not accompanied by an advertisement and no selling expenses have been given, paid, or incurred in connection therewith.

(2) No consideration has been given, paid, or incurred in connection with them.

(3) Within 30 days after the transaction, the insurer notifies the commissioner in writing of its occurrence. The notice shall describe the transaction, including the transaction date, the number and par value of shares issued, and the purpose of the transaction. The notice shall be executed under penalty of perjury.

(c) Par value increases resulting from a transfer of gross paid-in surplus to capital.

(d) Shares issued or distributed by an insurer as dividends to existing holders of shares of the insurer, on a pro rata basis according to the shares previously held by each holder, provided the new shares are of the same class and par value and have the same rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions as the outstanding shares.

(e) Any transfer of surplus to paid-up capital pursuant to subsection (d) shall not be deemed consideration for purposes of this section.

(f) Notwithstanding this section, the applicable notice provisions, contained in subdivision (e) of Section 1215.4, shall apply to those transactions set forth in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 820, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

827.5.

The term “insurer” as used in this section shall not include domestic insurers as defined in Section 26.

The following transactions of an insurer described in subdivisions (a), (c), (d), and (f) of Section 826 shall be exempt from the provisions of this article: 

(a) Any negotiations or agreements prior to general solicitation for the approval of the shareholders of said insurer and subject to such approval, of a change in the rights, preferences, privileges or restrictions of or on outstanding securities or a merger, consolidation or sale of corporate assets in consideration of the issuance of securities.

(b) Any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities of such insurer, unless the holders of at least 25 percent of the outstanding shares or units of any class of securities which will be directly or indirectly affected substantially and adversely by such change have addresses in this state according to the records of such insurer; or
